Washington statutes.
RCW 3.02.020

Review of proceedings.

Review of the proceedings in a court of limited jurisdiction shall be by the superior court, the procedure for which may be established by supreme court rule.

[ 1980 c 162 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective dates, savings—Severability—1980 c 162: See notes following RCW 3.02.010.